Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
STATE FOREST SERVICE

23-31-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that:

The management of Colorado's state-owned forested land has far-reaching impacts on overall forest condition, risk of wildfire, water quantity and quality, and wildlife habitat;

The unnatural condition of many forests throughout the state leaves them at great risk to catastrophic fires, invasion by exotic and native pest species, and other types of damage on a landscape scale;

As a result of the 2002 wildfire season, the worst in Colorado's recorded history, in which two thousand twelve fires consumed over half a million acres of forested land:

Local, state, and federal agencies incurred one hundred fifty-two million dollars in suppression costs and at least fifty million dollars to date in rehabilitation costs on United States forest service land alone; and

Eighty-one thousand four hundred thirty-five residents had to be evacuated from their homes;

Excessive runoff and soil erosion that occurs following wildfires poses a substantial threat to water quantity and quality in areas dependent on forest watersheds, including water supplies and wildlife;

Since 1937, United States forest service scientists have been studying the relationship between forests and water yields in the Fraser experimental forest in western Colorado and have found that unnaturally overgrown stands reduce water yields and that carefully applied natural forest management practices can conserve a more natural water yield;

Decades of scientific research have built a foundation of knowledge and technologies to inform and implement sound forest management and conservation;

Robust, resilient forest conditions that sustain diverse forest stages are essential for productive habitat, healthy populations of wildlife, and improved water quality and quantity for Colorado's fisheries;

Sound forest management activities, such as thinning, prescribed burning, and insect and disease treatments, improve the overall diversity and vigor of forested landscapes as well as the condition of related water, wildlife, recreation, and aesthetic resources;

The Colorado state forest service has worked cooperatively and successfully with the division of parks and wildlife and the state board of land commissioners to improve the condition of forested land and wildlife habitat in selected project areas;

These goals will be further advanced through the coordination of efforts to create community-based solutions to restore Colorado forest ecosystems, promote forest industries, and stimulate rural economies through the generation of clean energy from forest biomass;

The executive director of the department of natural resources is authorized to enter into an agreement with the board of governors of the Colorado state university system to work cooperatively with the Colorado state forest service and to provide staff for the division of forestry to carry out its mission of improving the health and sustainability of Colorado's forested state land.

The general assembly hereby declares that it is the public policy of this state to encourage the health of forest ecosystems through responsible management of the forest land of the state and through coordination with the United States secretary of the interior and the United States secretary of agriculture to develop management plans for federal lands within the state of Colorado pursuant to 16 U.S.C. sec. 530, 16 U.S.C. sec. 1604, and 43 U.S.C. sec. 1712, including the use of other pre-suppression activities, such as the harvest and profitable utilization of materials, in order to: Preserve forest and other natural resources; enhance the growth and maintenance of forests; conserve forest cover on watersheds; protect recreational, wildlife, and other values; promote stability of forest-using industries; and prevent loss of life and damage to property from wildfires and other conflagrations.

In addition to any other powers and duties conferred upon the Colorado state forest service by law, the Colorado state forest service may:

Value forest materials on state lands using lowest market value as an incentive to maximize the utilization of these products; and

Collaborate with the United States forest service and the bureau of land management to contract for a reliable source of feedstock consistent with Colorado communities' plans for utilization of forest biomass described in section 23-31-312 (3.5).

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 533, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1068, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(i.5) added and (2) amended, (SB 13-273), ch. 406, p. 2373, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1267, § 19, effective May 31.

L. 2015:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 957, § 57, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-301 as it existed prior to 2007.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding subsection (1)(i.5) and amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 406, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

23-31-302. Forestry function named.

The forestry function of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall be known as the "Colorado state forest service".

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 534, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-302 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-303. Funds available.

Repealed.

The beetle mitigation fund is hereby created in the state treasury to be administered by the Colorado state forest service for the purpose of removing trees infested by beetles from forests on state-owned land and otherwise mitigating the effects of beetle infestation on state-owned land. The fund shall consist of donations received pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

The Colorado state forest service shall create and maintain one or more web pages on its official website that provide information on the beetle mitigation fund to the public and that allow the public to donate to the fund online. Websites operated by other interested state departments shall add prominent links referring the public to the Colorado state forest service's beetle mitigation fund web page to encourage voluntary contributions to the fund. The Colorado state forest service shall transmit all such contributions to the state treasurer, who shall deposit them in the fund.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 534, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1553, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-020), ch. 189, p. 828, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2012:

(1) repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-304. State responsibility determined. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 535, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-020), ch. 189, p. 828, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-305. Cooperation by counties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 535, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-306. Sheriffs to enforce. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 535, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-307. Limitation of state responsibility. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 535, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-308. Emergencies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 535, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-309. Wildfire emergency response fund - creation - wildfire preparedness fund - creation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 535, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(6) added, (SB 09-001), ch. 30, p. 127, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-310. Forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program - technical advisory panel - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.

Short title. The short title of this section is the "Forest Restoration and Wildfire Risk Mitigation Act".

(1.5)

Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby:

Finds that:

Colorado's forests are fundamentally important to its citizens in providing clean air and water, recreation and tourism opportunities, wildlife habitat, and wood products;

Damaging wildfires occur regularly in Colorado due in part to fire suppression efforts and drought, the result of which are unhealthy, fire-prone forests; and

Colorado has experienced a significant increase in damaging wildfires that have destroyed homes, property, and other essential community infrastructure;

Determines that:

It is critical that we invest in measures that reduce the probability of catastrophic fires spreading uncontrollably into our communities in areas of the wildland-urban interface and reduce the financial costs of wildfire in Colorado;

Increasing our efforts to thin or otherwise manage to improve the forests in Colorado would keep our forests healthy and help mitigate risks associated with catastrophic wildfires that endanger lives, property, watersheds, and critical infrastructure;

Consolidating existing state grant programs will provide the necessary resources to the Colorado state forest service to allow the agency to continue to address watershed wildfire risks and forest health conditions in Colorado; augment its technical capacity to assess and reduce wildfire risk to people, property, and infrastructure; support implementation of community wildfire protection plans; enhance its technical outreach capabilities; and provide loans and grants for market-based forest treatment solutions to reduce wildfire risk, protect watersheds, and improve forest health;

Maintaining proper funding for a combined grant program will ensure that necessary resources are available to both reduce wildfire risk and improve forest health; and

Given the challenging conditions of Colorado's forests and the imminent risks of catastrophic wildfire, it is critical that state funding of the grants program be increased for the 2019-20 state fiscal year and that grant money be expended on an expedited basis to the greatest extent practicable to fulfill the purposes of this section; and

Declares that it intends to provide aid and guidance for catastrophic wildfire risk mitigation and forest health improvements by authorizing a competitive grant program to assist with funding community-level actions across the entire state that are implemented to protect populations and property in the wildland-urban interface and to promote forest health and the utilization of woody material, including traditional forest products and biomass energy.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Accredited Colorado youth corps" means a youth corps organization that is accredited by the Colorado youth corps association.

"Director" means the director of the forest service.

"Forest service" means the Colorado state forest service identified in section 23-31-302 and the division of forestry created in section 24-33-104.

"Fuel" means living and dead combustible vegetation that can feed a fire, including grass, leaves, pine boughs, shrubs, and trees.

"Hazardous fuel reduction treatment" means a treatment that removes or reduces vegetative fuel, including mechanical, manual, broadcast burning, and pile burning fire treatments, or reduces structural ignitability in order to:

Diminish the potential damage arising from a catastrophic wildfire;

Enhance the ability of emergency personnel to safely influence the spread of wildfire; or

Improve landscape-scale forest health conditions.

"Wildland-urban interface" or "WUI" means an area where:

Human development is close to wildland vegetation; and

There exists a high potential for a wildland fire.

Grant projects. The forest service shall issue a statewide request for proposals for cost-share grants for projects that are designed through a collaborative community process. The projects may be entirely on, or on any combination of, private, state, county, or municipal forest lands. Projects may also be on federal lands, so long as the project maintains continuity across a landscape including federal lands and the area of the federal lands does not exceed the combined area of the nonfederal lands involved in the project. The grant share of an individual project cost must not exceed fifty percent of the total cost of the project. In the case of a project that is located in an area with fewer economic resources, the grant share of an individual project cost must not exceed seventy-five percent of the total cost of the project. The remaining portion of the project's funding may be in the form of cash, stumpage, or in-kind contribution. In meeting the match requirements under this subsection (3), a project may be funded, in whole or in part, from gifts, grants, or donations received from any organization, entity, or individual. In measuring an in-kind contribution for purposes of meeting the fifty percent and twenty-five percent matches required by this subsection (3), "in-kind contribution" may include volunteer hours provided by the staff of an entity or organization applying for grant funding and the time for which staff receives monetary compensation in the form of salary or other financial benefits. Such compensated time that counts toward the in-kind contribution is limited to the estimated time of paid staff in planning and implementing the mitigation project. The forest service shall establish a policy that specifies the criteria by which a particular project will satisfy the requirement of this subsection (3) that it is located in an area with fewer economic resources, as applicable.

Eligibility requirements. To be eligible to receive funding under this section, a project must:

Reduce the risk to people and property in the wildland-urban interface and promote forest health;

Address one or more of the following objectives for the purpose of protecting water supplies:

Reducing the threat of large, high-intensity wildfires and the negative effects of excessive competition between trees by restoring ecosystem functions, structures, and species composition, including the reduction of nonnative species populations;

Preserving old and large trees to the extent consistent with ecological values and science;

Replanting trees in deforested areas if such areas exist in the proposed project area; and

Improving the use of, or adding value to, small diameter trees;

Comply with all applicable federal and state environmental laws;

Repealed.

Incorporate current scientific forest restoration information;

Include an assessment to:

Identify both the existing ecological condition of the proposed project area and the desired future condition; and

Report, upon project completion, to the forest service on the number of acres treated, cost per acre to treat, tonnage of material generated, number of jobs created, and use of any forest products generated; and

Leverage state funding through in-kind, stumpage, or cash matching contributions.

(4.3) In addition to satisfying subsection (4) of this section, a grant project that receives funding under this section may also support ongoing maintenance efforts by eligible recipients to reduce the threat of large, high-intensity wildfires.

(4.4)

Additional funding objectives.

As part of the submission of grant applications under this section, the forest service encourages applicants to include on their grant application information that indicates whether the project is supported by a diverse and balanced group of stakeholders as well as appropriate federal, state, county, and municipal government representatives in the design, implementation, and monitoring of the project.

(4.5)

Eligible recipients.

Eligible grant recipients include:

Local community groups, including homeowners' associations or neighborhood associations, that are within close proximity to the WUI;

Local government entities within or adjacent to the WUI;

Public or private utilities, including water providers, with infrastructure or land ownership in areas of high risk for catastrophic wildfires;

State agencies, such as the state land board or the division of parks and wildlife, that own lands or property in areas of high risk for catastrophic wildfires;

Nonprofit groups that promote hazardous fuel reduction treatment projects in partnership with local, state, or private entities;

A fire protection district, as defined in section 32-1-103 (7); and

A nonprofit organization or entity engaged in firefighting or fire management activities.

Technical advisory panel. The director shall convene a technical advisory panel to evaluate the proposals for forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grants and provide recommendations regarding which proposals would best meet the objectives of this section. The panel shall consider eligibility criteria established in subsections (4) and (4.5) of this section, a project's effect on long-term forest management, and the number of acres treated for state dollars spent and seek to use a consensus-based decision-making process to develop such recommendations. For hazardous fuel reduction projects pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, the panel shall show preference to applicants that have adopted or plan to adopt local measures that reduce wildfire risks to people, property, and infrastructure that complement funds provided through the program. Stronger measures shall receive greater preference, while taking into account geographic differences and needs for mitigation. A panel member shall recuse himself or herself if he or she has an actual or potential conflict of interest with respect to a grant applicant. The panel is composed of members to be appointed by the director. The composition of the panel includes at least:

An official to represent the department of natural resources;

One representative from federal land management agencies;

One independent scientist with experience in forest ecosystem restoration;

An official to represent the department of public safety;

One member who represents a county or municipal government with jurisdiction over an area of the WUI;

One member who represents the traditional forest products industry;

One member who represents the biomass energy products industry;

One member who represents a nonprofit collaborative group involved with the mitigation of catastrophic wildfires in Colorado and the maintenance and improvement of ecological health; and

Two members with expertise in water and watershed management.

Proposal selection. After consulting with the technical advisory panel established in subsection (5) of this section, the forest service shall select the proposals that will receive funding through this section. In carrying out approved projects, the project proponents shall, whenever feasible, contract with the Colorado youth corps association or an accredited Colorado youth corps to provide labor. The general assembly encourages the forest service to modify its administrative policies and procedures under this section to enable funding to be provided to grant recipients in March to enable wildfire mitigation to commence before the prime wildfire season starts in June.

Repealed.

Administrative costs. The forest service may utilize no more than seven percent of any amounts appropriated in any fiscal year for its direct and indirect costs in administering the program.

(8.2) Community watershed restoration and wildfire risk mitigation.

In order to support communities and land managers in efforts to reduce risk to people and property and in support of long-term ecological restoration so that the underlying condition of Colorado's forests supports a variety of values, particularly public water supply and high-quality wildlife habitat, the forest service shall:

Hire additional field capacity to support the implementation of forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation program grants awarded pursuant to this section;

In awarding grants pursuant to this section, give additional emphasis to projects that substantially leverage additional financial resources or that have been identified through a community-based collaborative process.

The forest service may use the unencumbered balance of the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund created in subsection (8.5) of this section for the purpose of complying with this subsection (8.2).

This subsection (8.2)(b) is repealed, effective September 1, 2028.

(8.3) Grant program.

The forest service shall develop and administer the program in consultation with the technical advisory panel created in subsection (5) of this section. In developing the program, the forest service shall:

Dedicate up to twenty-five percent of the money available in the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund, created in subsection (8.5) of this section, to fund capacity-building efforts to provide local governments, community groups, and collaborative forestry groups with the resources and staffing necessary to plan and implement forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation projects, including community and partner outreach and engagement, identifying priority project areas, prescription planning, and acquiring community equipment for use by landowners;

Dedicate up to five percent of the money available in the fund to be used by the forest service to:

Monitor grant recipients' compliance with the grant program; and

Measure the grant program's effectiveness;

Require a grant applicant to demonstrate that:

The grant applicant has available, or will have available before implementation of the project, matching funds in the form of a dollar-for-dollar match or the value of in-kind contributions for the project. A project's matching funds may come from federal sources or state sources, but no more than fifty percent of the matching funds may come from state sources; except that, if the grant applicant is a state agency, more than fifty percent of the matching funds may come from other state sources.

The proposed project includes a plan for utilizing any woody material generated by the project, including traditional forest products and biomass energy products. The forest service shall offer technical support to grant applicants to assist with the development of the applicant's plan for utilizing forest products. The forest service shall inform applicants of the availability of its technical support.

Encourage a grant applicant, where feasible, to utilize the labor of:

Youth and young adults participating in a Colorado youth corps organization accredited by the Colorado youth corps association; or

Veterans participating in an accredited Colorado corps program serving veterans;

In consultation with the technical advisory panel created in subsection (5) of this section, establish the information to be included in the grant application, including a description of the proposed project; and

Establish a plan for administering the grant program, including the development of:

Periodic reporting requirements;

Tools for monitoring and tracking grant projects; and

Measures for assessing the progress of grant projects.

Annually and in a final report to be presented before the end of the regular session in 2018, the forest service shall report to the agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee in the Colorado house of representatives and the agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee in the Colorado senate, or their successor committees, regarding the progress of the grant program, including information concerning the:

Number of acres treated;

Cost per acre to treat;

Tonnage of material generated;

Number of jobs created;

Use of any forest products generated; and

The grant program's ability to achieve its stated goals.

On and after the repeal of part 4 of article 7 of title 36, the forest service shall administer pursuant to this section all grants made pursuant to that part 4 before its repeal.

(8.5) Forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund. The department of higher education shall administer the fund, which consists of:

All money transferred by the treasurer as specified in subsection (8.7) of this section;

All money that was in the wildfire risk reduction fund created in section 36-7-405 prior to the repeal of that fund. As soon as possible after December 31, 2017, the state treasurer shall transfer the unencumbered fund balance of the wildfire risk reduction fund as of month-end close on December 31, 2017, to the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund.

Any other money appropriated or transferred to the fund by the general assembly.

All money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the department of higher education for allocation to the board of governors of the Colorado state university system for the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program specified in this section. All money in the fund at the end of each fiscal year remains in the fund and does not revert to the general fund or any other fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

(8.7) (a) On July 1, 2017, and July 1, 2018, the state treasurer shall transfer nine hundred fifty-four thousand five hundred forty-five dollars from the general fund to the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund.

On March 21, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer six million dollars from the general fund to the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer two million two hundred thousand dollars from the general fund to the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund.

This subsection (8.7) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

(8.8) It is the intent of the general assembly that any additional amount of money appropriated for the 2019-20 state fiscal year to the fund created in subsection (8.5)(a) of this section be expended on grants that will support the maximum number of effective forest management fuels reduction projects to reduce the impacts to life, property, and critical infrastructure caused by wildfire.

Repeal. This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2029.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1324, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

(8.5) added and (9) amended, pp. 1535, 1534, §§ 6, 1, effective May 28.

L. 2012:

(6), (8), (8.5), and (9) amended and (7) repealed, (HB 12-1032), ch. 69, p. 238, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 2017:

(8.5)(a)(I) amended and (8.7) added, (SB 17-259), ch. 190, p. 689, § 1, effective May 3; (1), (2), (3), IP(4), (4)(a), (4)(f)(II), (5), (6), (8.5), and (9) amended and (1.5), (4.5), (8.2), and (8.3) added, (SB 17-050), ch. 34, p. 99, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(8.7) amended, (HB 18-1338), ch. 201, p. 1308, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2019:

(1.5)(b)(V) and (8.8) added and (8.5)(a) amended, (HB 19-1006), ch. 398, p. 3537, § 1, effective May 31; (8.3)(a)(III)(B) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3467, § 21, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(3), (4.5)(d), (6), and (9) amended, (4)(d) repealed, and (4.3), (4.4), (4.5)(f), and (4.5)(g) added, (HB 20-1057), ch. 78, p. 318, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(8.7) amended, (SB 21-054), ch. 18, p. 95, § 1, effective March 21; (3) and IP(5) amended, (SB 21-221), ch. 91, p. 372, § 1, effective May 4; (3), IP(5), (8), (8.2)(a)(I), (8.2)(b)(II), and (8.3)(a)(I) amended, (SB 21-258), ch. 238, p. 1248, § 2, effective June 15; (8.5)(a)(I) amended, (SB 21-281), ch. 255, p. 1501, § 8, effective June 18.

L. 2022:

(5) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2976, § 51, effective August 10; (8.7)(c) added, (HB 22-1012), ch. 341, p. 2450, § 2, effective August 10.

23-31-311. Watershed protection projects and forest health projects.

The Colorado state forest service, representing the state of Colorado, shall, in consultation with the governmental agencies participating in such projects, identify watershed protection projects and forest health projects that will use moneys received pursuant to section 37-95-112.5, C.R.S., including, but not limited to, the harvesting of trees infested with beetles.

The Colorado state forest service shall collaborate with water providers; federal, state, and local governments; educational institutions; landowners; and other interested public and private entities to recommend the use of moneys made available pursuant to section 37-95-112.5, C.R.S. This process shall consider:

Areas that have the highest priority for ecological or wildfire hazard reduction restoration;

Areas that have been prioritized for treatment by a local or regional forest collaborative process or through a comparable stakeholder process; or

Watershed protection projects and forest health projects on private, state, and federal lands, including national forest and other federal lands that serve as the primary source of water to communities and municipalities and for agricultural purposes.

In identifying such watershed protection projects and forest health projects, consideration shall be made to effectively use available resources by:

Applying the principles of the state of Colorado good neighbor authority programs entered into between the Colorado state forest service and the United States forest service and between the Colorado state forest service and the United States bureau of land management;

Combining available resources with federal grant money, if any, and other complementary funding resources that are available for such projects or similar projects; and

Partnering on such projects being planned or conducted by governmental agencies with land management jurisdiction in community and municipal watersheds.

In carrying out such watershed protection projects and forest health projects, the Colorado state forest service shall, whenever feasible, contract with the Colorado youth corps association or an accredited Colorado youth corps to provide labor. For purposes of this section:

"Accredited Colorado youth corps" means a youth corps organization that is accredited by the Colorado youth corps association.

"Forest health project" has the meaning set forth in section 37-95-103, C.R.S.

"Governmental agencies" has the meaning set forth in section 37-95-112.5 (4), C.R.S.

"Watershed protection project" has the meaning set forth in section 37-95-103, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1542, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3)(c) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1966, § 72, effective August 5.

23-31-312. Community wildfire protection plans - biomass utilization plans - county governments - guidelines and criteria - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

Community wildfire protection plans, or CWPPs, are authorized and defined in section 101 of Title I of the federal "Healthy Forests Restoration Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-148, referred to in this section as "HFRA". Title I of HFRA authorizes the secretaries of agriculture and the interior to expedite the development and implementation of hazardous fuel reduction projects on federal lands managed by the United States forest service and the bureau of land management when these agencies meet certain conditions. HFRA emphasizes the need for federal agencies to work collaboratively with local communities in developing hazardous fuel reduction projects, placing priority on treatment areas identified by the local communities themselves in a CWPP. The wildland-urban interface area is one of the identified property areas that qualify under HFRA for the use of this expedited environmental review process.

The development of a CWPP can assist a local community in clarifying and refining its priorities for the protection of life, property, and critical infrastructure in its wildland-urban interface area. The CWPP brings together diverse federal, state, and local interests to discuss their mutual concerns for public safety, community sustainability, and natural resources. The CWPP process offers a positive, solution-oriented environment in which to address challenges such as local fire-fighting capability, the need for defensible space around homes and housing developments, the effect of fire ratings and combustibility standards for building materials used in wildland-urban interface areas, and where and how to prioritize land management on both federal and nonfederal lands. CWPPs can be as simple or complex as a local community desires.

The adoption of a CWPP brings many benefits to the state and adopting local community, including:

The opportunity to establish a locally appropriate definition and boundary for the wildland-urban interface area;

The establishment of relations with other state and local government officials, local fire chiefs, state and national fire organizations, federal land management agencies, private homeowners, electric, gas, and water utility providers in the subject area, and community groups, thereby ensuring collaboration among these groups in initiating a planning dialogue and facilitating the implementation of priority actions across ownership boundaries;

Specialized natural resource knowledge and technical expertise relative to the planning process, particularly in the areas of global positioning systems and mapping, vegetation management, assessment of values and risks, and funding strategies; and

Statewide leadership in developing and maintaining a list or map of communities at risk within the state and facilitating work among federal and local partners to establish priorities for action.

CWPPs give priority to projects that provide for the protection of at-risk communities or watersheds or that implement recommendations in the CWPP.

CWPPs assist local communities in influencing where and how federal agencies implement fuel reduction projects on federal lands, how additional federal funds may be distributed for projects on nonfederal lands, and in determining the types and methods of treatment that, if completed, would reduce the risk to the community.

The development of CWPPs promotes economic opportunities in rural communities.

By enacting this section, the general assembly intends to facilitate and encourage the development of CWPPs in counties with fire hazard areas in their territorial boundaries and to provide more statewide uniformity and consistency with respect to the content of CWPPs in counties needing protection against wildfires.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"CWPP" means a community wildfire protection plan as authorized and defined in section 101 of Title I of the federal "Healthy Forests Restoration Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-148.

"Fire hazard area" means an area mapped by the Colorado state forest service, identified in section 23-31-302, as facing a substantial and recurring risk of exposure to severe fire hazards.

"Red zone" means a wildland-urban interface area of high wildfire risk in Colorado, identified by the red zone map originally created in September 2004 by the Colorado state forest service and periodically updated to show areas where a high risk of catastrophic wildfire endangers homes, communities, utilities, and watersheds.

Not later than November 15, 2009, the state forester, in collaboration with representatives of the United States forest service, the Colorado department of natural resources, county governments, municipal governments, local fire departments or fire protection districts, electric, gas, and water utility providers in the subject area, and state and local law enforcement agencies, shall establish guidelines and criteria for counties to consider in preparing their own CWPPs to address wildfires in fire hazard areas within the unincorporated portion of the county.

(3.5) When a community within a red zone adopts or updates a CWPP, the community is encouraged to include, as an element of the CWPP, a plan for community-based and sustainable utilization of forest biomass for the production of energy, fuels, forest products, and other applications, developed in consultation with the Colorado state forest service. As part of the plan, the state forester or the state forester's designee may offer assistance to the communities in identifying, contracting for, and securing primarily from high-risk areas a reliable source of feedstock in support of forest products industries.

The adoption of a CWPP by a county government shall be governed by the requirements of section 30-15-401.7, C.R.S.

The state forester shall send timely notice of the guidelines and criteria established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to the department of local affairs and to statewide organizations representing Colorado counties and municipalities and shall post such information on the website of the Colorado state forest service.

Nothing in this section affects section 23-31-309 or the wildfire preparedness plan developed pursuant to section 24-33.5-1227, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-001), ch. 30, p. 123, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (SB 13-270), ch. 250, p. 1317, § 7, effective May 23; (2)(c) and (3.5) added, (SB 13-273), ch. 406, p. 2374, § 3, effective June 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding subsections (2)(c) and (3.5), see section 1 of chapter 406, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.